Ohio, session 136, HB663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) The Artificial Intelligence Study Commission is created. The Commission shall do all of the following: (1) Review current state and local government approaches to oversight and regulation of artificial intelligence; (2) Not later than December 31, 2028, issue a report of its findings and recommendations to the Governor, the President and Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives, including both of the following: (a) A review of state and local government use of artificial intelligence in this state; (b) Recommendations for a comprehensive regulatory framework regarding the use of artificial intelligence in this state. (B) The Commission may hold hearings regarding legislation pending in the House of Representatives and the Senate and provide recommendations to the members of each chamber. (C) The Commission shall consist of the following members: (1) The State Chief Information Officer, who shall serve as a co-chair of the Commission; (2) The Director of Commerce, who shall serve as a co-chair of the Commission; (3) One member from the private sector with significant experience in the development or application of artificial intelligence technologies appointed by the Governor; (4) One member with expertise in energy or other critical infrastructure systems appointed by the Governor; (5) One member from institutions of higher education with demonstrated expertise in artificial intelligence appointed by the Governor; (6) One member from the Department of Public Safety appointed by the Director of Public Safety; (7) One member from the K–12 education community appointed by the Director of Education and Workforce; (8) One member from a local workforce development board appointed by the Governor; (9) One member representing the interests of consumers appointed by the Governor; (10) One member from local government appointed by the Governor; (11) One member from the Department of Agriculture appointed by the Director of Agriculture; (12) Four members of the General Assembly, two members from the majority party appointed by the Speaker of the House and the President of the Senate, and two members from the minority party appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives and Minority Leader of the Senate. (D)(1) All members of the Commission are voting members. (2) Each appointed member of the Commission serves at the pleasure of the member's appointing authority. (3) The appointing authorities shall appoint all appointed members of the Commission before the Commission's first meeting. (4) Any vacancy in the Commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (5) Members of the Commission shall serve without compensation. (E)(1) The Commission shall hold its initial meeting at the call of the Governor, not later than January 30, 2027. (2) All subsequent meetings of the Commission shall be held at the call of the co-chairpersons. The Commission shall meet on a quarterly basis, or more often, at the discretion of the co-chairpersons. (F) The staff of the House of Representatives, the Senate, Department of Administrative Services, and the Department of Commerce shall provide technical and administrative support as needed by the Commission. (G) The Commission ceases to exist on January 1, 2029.